Hawaii statutes.
[§46-12.5] State beach park lifeguard
services. Each county may provide lifeguard services for any state beach
park where the number of swimmers using the beach may warrant a lifeguard, or
where water hazards at the beach present a threat to public safety; provided
that the county and the department of land and natural resources shall first
mutually agree that those services are necessary for the particular beach. [L
1990, c 182, §1]

Note

Exception to liability for county lifeguard services
(repealed June 30, 2017). L 2002, c 170; L 2007, c 152, §4; L 2008, c 144, §1;
L 2009, c 81, §2; L 2014, c 98, §1.

Cross References

Conclusive
presumptions relating to duty of public entities to warn of dangers at public
beach parks, see §663-1.56.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next